Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1316

Status of filings.

A filing under this subchapter executed by a domestic cooperative association becomes part of the public organic record of the cooperative association if the cooperative association's organic law provides that similar filings under that law become part of the public organic record of the cooperative association.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1316.]